Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.485

Minimum retirement allowance—Cost-of-living adjustment—Post-retirement adjustment—Computation.

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1989, as a cost-of-living adjustment, no beneficiary receiving a retirement allowance pursuant to this chapter shall receive, as the pension portion of that retirement allowance, less than fourteen dollars and eighty-two cents per month for each year of service creditable to the person whose service is the basis of the pension. Portions of a year shall be treated as fractions of a year and the decimal equivalent shall be multiplied by fourteen dollars and eighty-two cents. Where the pension payable was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum pension provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1979, the retirement allowance of each beneficiary who either is receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.520 or 41.32.550 as of December 31, 1978, or commenced receiving a monthly retirement allowance under this chapter as of a date no later than July 1, 1974, shall be permanently increased by a post-retirement adjustment. This adjustment shall be in lieu of any adjustments provided under *RCW 41.32.499(6) as of July 1, 1979, or July 1, 1980, for the affected beneficiaries. Such adjustment shall be calculated as follows:

(a) Retirement allowances to which this subsection and subsection (1) of this section are both applicable shall be determined by first applying subsection (1) and then applying this subsection. The department shall determine the total years of creditable service and the total dollar benefit base accrued as of December 31, 1978, except that this determination shall take into account only those beneficiaries to whom this subsection applies;

(b) The department shall multiply the total benefits determined in (a) of this subsection by six percent and divide the dollar value thus determined by the total service determined in (a) of this subsection. The resultant figure shall then be a post-retirement increase factor which shall be applied as specified in (c) of this subsection;

(c) Each beneficiary to whom this subsection applies shall receive an increase which is the product of the factor determined in (b) of this subsection multiplied by the years of creditable service.

(3) The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be applicable to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.540 or 41.32.760 through 41.32.825.

[ 1989 c 272 s 5; 1987 c 455 s 1; 1986 c 306 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 96 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.32.499 was repealed by 1995 c 345 s 11.

Purpose—1989 c 272: See note following RCW 41.32.005.

Effective date—1987 c 455: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987." [ 1987 c 455 s 9.]

Effective date—1986 c 306: "This act shall take effect on July 1, 1986." [ 1986 c 306 s 5.]